Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.335

Oral history activities—Funding—Joint rules.

The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives may fund oral history activities through donations as provided in RCW 44.04.340 and through funds in the legislative gift center account created in RCW 44.73.020. The activities may include, but not be limited to, conducting interviews, preparing and indexing transcripts, publishing manuscripts and photographs, and presenting displays and programs. Donations that do not meet the criteria of the legislative oral history program may not be accepted. The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall adopt joint rules necessary to implement this section.

[ 2008 c 222 s 6.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2008 c 222: See note following RCW 44.04.320.